Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 4. Mortgage Loan Originator Licensing

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-640.
Additional definitions.

As used in this part:

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 27 § 2.

“Clerical or support duties” means:

The receipt, collection, distribution and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms, or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms;

“Depository institution” means an organization as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act and includes any credit union;

“Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one (1) to four (4) units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. “Dwelling”, if it is used as a residence, includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home and trailer;

“Federal banking agency” means the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the comptroller of the currency, the national credit union administration or the federal deposit insurance corporation;

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, stepsibling and any adoptive relationship included in this paragraph;

“Individual” means a natural person;

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of an organization employing or contracting with a mortgage loan originator, or an exempt person under W.S.

40-14-121

;

“Mortgage loan originator”:

Means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application; or

Offers or negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan.

Shall not include any individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise described in W.S. 40-14-641(d);

Shall not include a person who only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Wyoming law, unless the person is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator; and

Shall not include a person solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare plans.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any mortgage product other than a thirty (30) year fixed rate mortgage;

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real property;

Arranging meetings or communicating with any party interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental or exchange of real property, unless the negotiating relates to the financing of these transactions, which shall then constitute engaging in the business as a mortgage loan originator;

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C) or (D) of this paragraph.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who:

Is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the registry; and

Meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of:

An institution regulated by the farm credit administration;

A depository institution; or

A subsidiary that is:

Owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

Regulated by a federal banking agency.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 27 § 2.

“Residential mortgage loan” means a consumer loan as defined in W.S.

40-14-304

or a consumer credit sale as defined in W.S.

40-14-204

, made primarily for personal, family or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;

“Timeshare plan” means as defined in 11 U.S.C. § 101(53D);

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the registry.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2013 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a)(i) and (xiii), which read: “(i) ‘Channeling agent’ means the third party licensing system that gathers the application information and distributes it to Wyoming for review for the approval or denial decision. (xiii) ‘Registry’ means the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry which is a mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of state bank supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage lenders, mortgage brokers and mortgage loan originators.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "the director of the office of thrift supervision," following "of the currency" in (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs:
“This act shall apply to new licenses issued
by the division of banking
under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code
and the Money Transmitter Act
on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions
of law existing prior to
amendment by this act shall apply to renewal
of licenses issued by
the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer
Credit Code and
the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-641.
Loan originator licensing; registration; rulemaking.

An individual, unless specifically exempted under subsection (c) of this section, shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator for any dwelling located in Wyoming without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license in accordance with part 4 of this article. Each licensed mortgage loan originator shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

In order to facilitate an orderly transition to licensing and minimize disruption in the marketplace, the effective date for subsection (a) of this section shall be July 1, 2010.

An individual is exempt from subsection (a) of this section if he is:

A registered mortgage loan originator, when acting for an entity described in W.S. 40-14-640(a)(xii)(B)(I), (II) or (III);

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual;

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that serves as the individual’s residence;

A licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker or other mortgage loan originator;

An individual engaging solely in loan processor or underwriter activities, who does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor shall not engage in the activities of a loan processor or underwriter unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter obtains and maintains a license pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Each independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator shall have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

For the purpose of implementing an orderly and efficient licensing process the administrator may establish licensing rules or regulations and interim procedures for licensing and acceptance of applications.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “the individual's” for “a seller's” in (c)(iii).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-642.
Loan originator application; processing.

Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply in a form prescribed by the administrator. Each application form shall contain content as established by the administrator and may be changed or updated as necessary by the administrator in order to carry out the purposes of part 4 of this article.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the administrator may establish relationships or contract with the registry or any other entity designated by the registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this act.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience, including the submission of authorization for the registry and the administrator to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (c)(i) of this section and subparagraph (c)(ii)(B) of this section, the administrator may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the administrator may have to maintain for purposes of subparagraphs (c)(ii)(A) and (B) of this section, the administrator may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source as directed by the administrator.

Each application submitted under subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by an application fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00), as established by rule of the administrator. When an application for licensure is denied or withdrawn, the administrator shall retain all fees paid by the applicant. Fees charged and collected under this section shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in (f).

§ 40-14-643.
Issuance of loan originator licenses.

The administrator shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the administrator makes at a minimum the following findings:

The applicant has not had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;

The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court:

During the seven (7) year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust or money laundering. Any pardon of a conviction shall not be a conviction for the purposes of this paragraph.

The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this act;

The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement pursuant to W.S.

40-14-644

;

The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in W.S.

40-14-645

.

For purposes of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, a person has shown that he is not financially responsible when he has shown a disregard in the management of his own financial condition. A determination that an individual has not shown financial responsibility shall include, but not be limited to:

Having any outstanding judgment, except a judgment solely as a result of medical expenses;

Having any outstanding tax lien or other government lien;

Having any foreclosure within the past three (3) years;

Having a pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three (3) years.

Upon written request, an applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The administrator has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied, or objections to the application have been filed with the administrator;

The administrator has not issued a license within sixty (60) days after a complete application for the license was filed.

If a hearing is held, the applicant and those filing objections shall reimburse, pro rata, the administrator for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the hearing. Notwithstanding any provision under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, a request for hearing shall not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the applicant has received notification by certified mail that the application has been denied and stating in substance the administrator’s finding supporting denial of the application or that objections have been filed and the substance thereof.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-644.
Prelicensing and relicensing education of loan originators.

In order to meet the prelicensing education requirement referred to in W.S. 40-14-643(a)(iv), a person shall complete at least twenty (20) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations related to mortgage origination;

Three (3) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, prelicensing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the registry. The review and approval of a prelicensing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any prelicensing education course, as approved by the registry, that is provided by the employer of the applicant or an entity which is affiliated with the applicant by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Prelicensing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the registry.

The prelicensing education requirements approved by the registry in paragraphs (a)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of prelicensing education requirements in Wyoming.

An individual licensed under W.S.

40-14-641

after July 1, 2009 and who subsequently applies to be licensed again:

Shall not have to complete prelicensing education requirements;

Shall have completed all the continuing education requirements pursuant to W.S.

40-14-647

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-645.
Testing of mortgage loan originators.

In order to meet the written test requirement under W.S. 40-14-643(a)(v), an individual shall pass, in accordance with the standards established under this section, a qualified written test developed by the registry and administered by a test provider approved by the registry.

A written test shall not be treated as a qualified written test for purposes of subsection (a) of this section unless the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including:

Ethics;

Federal law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination;

Wyoming law and regulation pertaining to mortgage origination; and

Federal and Wyoming law and regulation, including instruction on fraud, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace and fair lending issues.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a test provider from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant, the location of any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant or the location of any entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

An individual shall not be considered to have passed a qualified written test unless the individual achieves a test score of not less than seventy-five percent (75%) correct answers to test questions.

An individual may retake a test three (3) times with each test taking occurring at least thirty (30) days after the preceding test.

After failing three (3) tests, an individual shall wait at least six (6) months before taking the test again.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for at least five (5) years shall retake the written test. Any time the individual spends working as a registered mortgage loan originator shall not be counted against this five (5) year period.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-646.
Standards for loan originator license renewal; rulemaking.

The minimum standards for license renewal for mortgage loan originators shall include the following:

The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for license issuance under W.S. 40-14-643(a)(i) through (v);

The mortgage loan originator has satisfied the annual continuing education requirements described in W.S.

40-14-647

;

The mortgage loan originator has paid the license renewal fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00), as established by rule of the administrator.

Each mortgage loan originator license shall expire on December 31. The license shall be renewed annually by satisfying the minimum standards for license renewal not less than thirty (30) days before the stated expiration date. The administrator may establish rules for the reinstatement of expired licenses consistent with the standards established by the registry.

Any fee charged and collected under this section shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (c).

§ 40-14-647.
Continuing education for mortgage loan originators; rulemaking.

In order to meet the annual continuing education requirements required by W.S. 40-14-646(a)(ii), a licensed mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight (8) hours of education approved in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, which shall include at least:

Three (3) hours of federal law and regulations relating to mortgage origination;

Two (2) hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection and fair lending issues; and

Two (2) hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, continuing education courses shall be reviewed and approved by the registry. The review and approval of a continuing education course shall include review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any education course, as approved by the registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity which is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of such employer or entity.

Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online or by any other means approved by the registry.

A licensed mortgage loan originator:

Except as provided in W.S. 40-14-646(b), shall only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken; and

Shall not take the same approved course in the same year or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who is an instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for the licensed mortgage loan originator’s own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two (2) hours credit for every one (1) hour taught.

An individual having successfully completed the education requirements approved by the registry in paragraphs (a)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this section for any state shall be accepted as credit towards completion of continuing education requirements in Wyoming.

An individual meeting the requirements of W.S. 40-14-646(a)(i) and (iii) may make up any deficiency in continuing education as established by rule of the administrator.

An individual licensed under W.S.

40-14-641

after July 1, 2009 and who subsequently applies to be licensed again shall complete the continuing education requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance of a new or renewed license.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-648.
Authority to require license.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the administrator by law, the administrator shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the registry. In order to carry out this requirement the administrator may participate in the registry. For this purpose, the administrator may establish by rule any requirements as necessary, including but not limited to:

Background checks for:

Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases;

Civil or administrative records;

Credit history; or

Any other information as deemed necessary by the registry.

The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the registry; and

Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the administrator deems necessary for participation in the registry.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-649.
Unique identifier; rulemaking.

The unique identifier of any person originating a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan applications forms, solicitations or advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by rule of the administrator.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.